Massachusetts, session 194th, H4815.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION l. (a) Notwithstanding sections 11, 11A and 17 of chapter 138 of the General
Laws, and chapter 28 of the acts of 2006, chapter 83 of the acts of 2010, chapter 3 of the acts of
2012 and chapter 310 of the acts of 2018, the select board of the town of Arlington may cause to
be placed upon the ballot at a town election held in the year 2026 the following question:
“Shall the Select Board of the town be authorized to issue 2 additional licenses for the
sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises?
Yes______No______”
(b) If a majority of voters voting at the 2026 town election at which the question
authorized by subsection (a) appears on the ballot vote ‘yes’ on the question, then the select
board of the town of Arlington may issue 2 additional licenses for the sale of all alcoholic
beverages not to be drunk on the premises. The licenses shall be subject to chapter 138 of the
General Laws, except as provided in this act.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2